West Virginia, session 2026, SB1009.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. SPECIALIZED ADVOCACY PROGRAMS. §49-3-101. Child advocacy centers; services; requirements. (a) Child advocacy centers provide the following services to children in the child welfare program in West Virginia:(1) Operation of a child-appropriate or child-friendly facility that provides a comfortable, private setting that is both physically and psychologically safe for clients.(2) Participation in a multidisciplinary team for response to child abuse allegations.(3) Operate a legal entity responsible for program and fiscal operations that has established and implemented basic sound administrative practices.(4) Promote policies, practices and procedures that are culturally competent and diverse. Cultural competency is defined as the capacity to function in more than one culture, requiring the ability to appreciate, understand and interact with members of diverse populations within the local community.(5) Conduct forensic interviews in a manner which is of a neutral, fact-finding nature and coordinated to avoid duplicative interviewing.(6) Provide specialized medical evaluation and treatment made available to clients as part of the team response, either at the CAC or through coordination and referral with other specialized medical providers.(7) Offer therapeutic intervention through specialized mental health services made available as part of the team response, either at the child advocacy center or through coordination and referral with other appropriate treatment providers.(8) Victim support and advocacy as part of the team response, either at the child advocacy center or through coordination with other providers, throughout the investigation and subsequent legal proceedings.(9) Conducting team discussions and providing information sharing regarding the investigation, case status and services needed by the child and family are to occur on a routine basis.(10) Developing and implementing a system for monitoring case progress and tracking case outcomes for team components.(11) May establish a safe exchange location for children and families who have a parenting agreement or an order providing for visitation or custody of the children that require a safe exchange location.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, persons who are acting in the official scope of the person's duties as a member of a multidisciplinary team or as a board member, staff member, or volunteer of a local specialized child's advocacy center are not liable for civil damages based on a recommendation made or an opinion rendered in good faith.